Washington statutes.
RCW 25.05.110

Statement of partnership authority.

(1) A partnership may deliver to the secretary of state for filing a statement of partnership authority, which:

(a) Must include:

(i) The name of the partnership; and

(ii) The street address of its chief executive office and of one office in this state, if there is one; and

(b) May state the names of all of the partners, the names of the partners authorized to execute an instrument transferring real property held in the name of the partnership, the authority, or limitations on the authority, of some or all of the partners to enter into other transactions on behalf of the partnership and any other matter.

(2) A grant of authority contained in a filed statement of partnership authority is conclusive in favor of a person not a partner who gives value without knowledge to the contrary, so long as and to the extent that a limitation on that authority is not then contained in a subsequently filed statement. A filed cancellation of a limitation on authority revives the previous grant of authority.

(3) A person not a partner is deemed to know of a limitation on the authority of a partner to transfer real property held in the name of the partnership if the limitation is contained in a filed statement of partnership authority.

(4) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section and RCW 25.05.265 and 25.05.320, a person not a partner is not deemed to know of a limitation on the authority of a partner merely because the limitation is contained in a filed statement.

(5) Unless earlier canceled, a filed statement of partnership authority is canceled by operation of law five years after the date on which the statement, or the most recent amendment, was filed by the secretary of state.

[ 2015 c 176 s 5103; 1998 c 103 s 303.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.